Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1071.
do enact as follows:AB1071,11Section 1. 97.45 of the statutes is created to read:AB1071,2,3297.45 Testing and labeling related to toxic heavy metals in baby food. 3(1) Definitions. In this section:AB1071,2,64(a) “Baby food” means food that is or is intended to be packaged in a jar, pouch, 5tub, or box and that is sold or intended to be sold specifically for children under 2 6years of age. “Baby food” includes infant formula, as defined in 21 USC 321 (z).AB1071,2,97(b) “Final baby food product” means the finished product of baby food with a 8unique universal product code. “Final baby food product” does not include the 9individual ingredients that are in baby food.AB1071,2,1110(c) “Manufacturer” includes a food manufacturer, food processor, or food 11packer.AB1071,2,1312(d) “Product label” means a display of written, printed, or graphic material 13that is affixed to a final baby food product or the product’s immediate container.AB1071,3,31(e) “Product shelf life,” with respect to a final baby food product, means the 2time, measured in number of months, between the product’s date of manufacture 3and the product’s expiration date.AB1071,3,54(f) “Quick response code” means a machine-readable code, consisting of an 5array of squares, used for storing data that allows a user to access a web page.AB1071,3,66(g) “Toxic heavy metal” means arsenic, cadmium, lead, or mercury.AB1071,3,97(2) Prohibited activities. No person may manufacture, sell or offer for sale, 8deliver, or hold for sale in this state any baby food that does not comply with the 9requirements of this section.AB1071,3,1510(3) Testing disclosures. (a) If a manufacturer of baby food conducts testing 11for toxic heavy metals that will be present in the final baby food product of the 12manufacturer, the manufacturer shall publicly disclose on the manufacturer’s 13website, for each final baby food product that it manufactures in this state or that is 14sold or offered for sale, delivered, or held for sale in this state, all of the following 15information:AB1071,3,17161. The name and level of each toxic heavy metal present in the final baby food 17product as determined by the testing, and the date of testing.AB1071,3,21182. Descriptive information, including the product’s name, universal product 19code, size, and lot or batch number, sufficient to enable consumers to accurately 20identify the final baby food product associated with the testing information 21specified in subd. 1.AB1071,3,23223. Whether the testing was conducted in accordance with federal food and 23drug administration testing protocols and standards for the applicable type of test.AB1071,4,224(b) If a manufacturer of baby food is required to disclose information on the 1manufacturer’s website as provided in par. (a), the manufacturer shall also do all of 2the following:AB1071,4,631. Include on the final baby food product label a quick response code that 4directly links to the manufacturer’s website disclosure under par. (a) applicable to 5the final baby food product and the statement: “For information about toxic element 6testing on this product, scan the QR code.”AB1071,4,972. Include on the manufacturer’s website a link to the web page on the federal 8food and drug administration’s website that includes the most recent guidance and 9information about the health effects of toxic heavy metals on children.AB1071,4,1210(c) The information required to be disclosed on a manufacturer’s website 11under par. (a) shall be maintained on the website for the duration of the product 12shelf life for the final baby food product plus one month.AB1071,4,1613(d) A manufacturer of baby food shall provide to the department, upon the 14department’s request, the results of any testing conducted under this subsection as 15well as details of the protocols and standards used in the manufacturer’s testing 16program.AB1071,4,2117(4) Disclosures of nontesting. (a) If a manufacturer of baby food does not 18conduct testing for toxic heavy metals that will be present in the final baby food 19product that it manufactures in this state or that is sold or offered for sale, 20delivered, or held for sale in this state, the manufacturer shall do all of the following 21with respect to each such final baby food product:AB1071,4,22221. Publicly disclose on the manufacturer’s website all of the following:AB1071,5,223a. Descriptive information, including the product’s name, universal product 1code, size, and lot or batch number, sufficient to enable consumers to accurately 2identify the final baby food product.AB1071,5,53b. A statement, in clear language that is understandable to laypersons, that 4the final baby food product has not been tested for the presence of toxic heavy 5metals.AB1071,5,862. Include on the final baby food product label a quick response code that 7directly links to the manufacturer’s publicly available web page containing the 8information specified in subd. 1. a. and b.AB1071,5,119(b) The information required to be disclosed on a manufacturer’s website 10under par. (a) shall be maintained on the website for the duration of the product 11shelf life for the final baby food product plus one month.AB1071,5,1412(5) Consumer complaints; enforcement. (a) The department shall 13establish a process to receive complaints from the public relating to any alleged 14violation of this section and shall investigate these complaints.AB1071,5,1615(b) A person who violates sub. (2) is subject to a forfeiture of $100 for each day 16the violation occurs, for each product to which the violation applies.AB1071,217Section 2. Initial applicability.AB1071,5,2018(1) This act first applies to baby food, as defined in s. 97.45 (1) (a), that is 19manufactured, sold or offered for sale, delivered, or held for sale in this state on the 20first day of the 7th month beginning after publication.AB1071,5,2121